District of Columbia statutes.
6-341.04

Transfer not a local grant-in-aid.

No transfer or donation of any interest in real property under the authority of this subchapter shall constitute a local grant-in-aid in connection with any urban renewal project being undertaken with federal assistance under title I of the Housing Act of 1949, as amended.

History

Nov. 2, 1965, 79 Stat. 1184, Pub. L. 89-317, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-839.
1973 Ed., § 5-736.

References in Text

Title I of the Housing Act of 1949, as amended, referred to in this section, is the Act of July 15, 1949, 63 Stat. 413, ch. 338.